Utah statutes.
4-2-8.7.    Invasive Species Mitigation Fund created.
(1)  As used in this section, "project" means an undertaking that prevents
catastrophic wildland fire through land restoration in a watershed that:
(a)  is impacted by cheatgrass or other invasive species; or
(b)  has a fuel load that may contribute to a catastrophic wildland fire.
(2) (a)  There is created a general fund restricted account known as the
"Invasive Species Mitigation Fund."
(b)  The fund shall consist of:
(i)  money appropriated by the Legislature;
(ii)  grants from the federal government; and
(iii)  grants or donations from a person.
(3)  Any unallocated balance in the fund at the end of the year is nonlapsing.
(4) (a)  After consulting with the Department of Natural Resources and the
Conservation Commission, the department may expend fund monies:
(i)  on a project implemented by:
(A)  the department; or
(B)  the Conservation Commission; or
(ii)  by giving a grant for a project to:
(A)  a state agency;
(B)  a federal agency; or
(C)  a federal, state, tribal, or private landowner.
(b)  A grant to a federal landowner must be matched with at least an equal
amount of money by the federal landowner.
(c)  In expending the fund monies authorized by Subsection (4)(a)(i), the
department shall use existing infrastructure and employees to plan and
implement the project.
(5)  In giving a grant, the department shall consider the effectiveness of a
project in preventing:
(a)  first, the risk to public safety and health from:
(i)  air pollution;
(ii)  flooding; and
(iii)  reduced visibility on a highway;
(b)  second, damage to the environment, including:
(i)  soil erosion;
(ii)  degraded water quality; and
(iii)  release of carbon; and
(c)  third, damage to:
(i)  a local economy; and
(ii)  habitat for wildlife or livestock.
